Washington statutes.
RCW 43.133.060

Sunrise notes—Filing.

Sunrise notes shall be filed with:

(1) The committee to which the bill or resolution was referred upon introduction in the house of origin;

(2) The senate committee on ways and means or its successor;

(3) The house of representatives committee on ways and means or its successor;

(4) The senate governmental operations committee or its successor; and

(5) The house of representatives state government committee or its successor.

[ 1987 c 342 s 6.]